Wyoming statutes. Title 22 Elections
Chapter 8 Judges of Election and Counting Boards

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d Elections §§ 86 to 99.

29 C.J.S. Elections §§ 102 to 126.

§ 22-8-101.
Notice of election officials needed; county chairmen to submit list of names; municipal clerks list of names appointment.

Not later than the third Tuesday of April in each general election year, each county clerk shall notify the county chairmen of the major and minor political parties in the county of the number of election judges and counting board members and alternates needed for the ensuing two (2) year term.

Not later than the third Tuesday of May in each general election year the county chairman of each major and minor political party in each county may certify to the county clerk a list of registered electors residing in the county and affiliated with the party, and a list of persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age who otherwise meet all requirements for qualification as an elector, who are willing to serve as a judge of election or as a member of a counting board.

Not later than the third Tuesday of May in each general election year municipal clerks may submit to the county clerk a list of registered electors, and a list of persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age who otherwise meet all requirements for qualification as an elector, residing in the municipality they represent who are willing to serve as a judge of election or as a member of a counting board.

Not later than June 30, the county clerk on each general election year shall appoint judges of election and counting boards and alternates from lists submitted by the county chairmen of the major and minor political parties.

If the list of nominees for judges of election and members of counting boards provided by the county chairman is insufficient, the county clerk shall consider the list submitted by the municipal clerks and may appoint any elector otherwise qualified to be a judge of election or a member of a counting board.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-118; Laws 1985, ch. 119, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, inserted “and a list of persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age who otherwise meet all requirements for qualification as an elector” in (b) and (c).

§ 22-8-102.
Qualifications.

Except as otherwise provided by this section, judges of election and members of counting boards shall be registered electors and shall be physically, morally and mentally competent to perform their duties. The county clerk may appoint persons who are at least sixteen (16) years of age to serve as judges of election or members of counting boards if such persons meet all other requirements for qualification of an elector. A judge of election shall not be a member of a counting board at the same election except as provided by W.S. 22-8-108(d).

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-119; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2005, ch. 104, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the exception at the beginning and inserted the second sentence.

§ 22-8-103.
Terms.

Judges of election and members of counting boards serve for two (2) years or until their successors are appointed.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-120.

§ 22-8-104.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1985, ch. 119, § 2.

Cross references. —

For present provisions as to certification of a list of registered electors willing to serve as election officials, see §

22-8-101

.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, related to providing of lists by county chairmen of political parties.

§ 22-8-105.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1998, ch. 100, § 5.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1, authorized the county clerk to appoint an elector qualified to be judge of election or member of a counting board where the list of nominees for such was insufficient.

§ 22-8-106.
Number of judges in each polling place.

At least three (3) judges shall be appointed for each polling place. Additional judges may be appointed in a polling place as determined necessary by the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-123; Laws 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 2005, ch. 104, § 1; 2007, ch. 39, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, deleted the last sentence, which read: “No more than one (1) person under the age of eighteen (18) may be appointed as an election judge for each precinct.”

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct” twice.

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

§ 22-8-107.
Absentee ballot counting boards.

If the alternate procedure for counting absentee ballots described in W.S.

22-9-125

is used, at least three (3) judges shall be appointed as an absentee ballot counting board in the same manner as other election judges are appointed. These judges shall determine legality of absentee ballots and count absentee ballots or in the case of electronic voting systems, the ballots shall be counted at the designated counting center.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-124; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1985, ch. 119, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-8-108.
Appointment, composition and authority of counting boards; when judges to count.

The county clerk shall appoint a counting board for each paper ballot polling place casting more than three hundred (300) votes at the last general election, and may appoint a counting board in such a polling place in which one hundred fifty (150) or more such votes were cast at such election. A counting board shall have three (3) members or more to facilitate the counting of votes. No more than one (1) person under the age of eighteen (18) may be appointed as to each counting board.

A counting board shall be appointed for each designated counting center in each county using an electronic voting system. The board shall consist of at least seven (7) members who shall be the county clerk or his designated deputy, and three (3) members of each major political party appointed by the county clerk. Additional members may be appointed by the county clerk if deemed necessary by the county clerk but equal major party membership shall be assured. No more than one (1) person under the age of eighteen (18) may be appointed as to each counting board.

The counting board in a paper ballot polling place has no authority to act until polls are declared closed as provided in W.S.

22-13-117

, except as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d). A counting board in an electronic voting system counting center may commence preparing absentee ballots for counting at any time on election day, or before election day as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d).

For a polling place where a counting board need not be appointed, the judges of election shall count the votes.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 51, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-125; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1990, ch. 42, § 1; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2005, ch. 104, § 1; 2015 ch. 138, § 1, effective March 4, 2015; 2022 ch. 39, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, added the last sentence in (a) and (b).

The 2015 amendment,

substituted “polling place” for “precinct” in (a), (c), and (d).

Laws 2015, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 4, 2015.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, in (c), added “as provided in W.S.

22-13-117

, except as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d)” at the end of the first sentence, in the second sentence, deleted “the day of the” following “any time on,” and added “day, or before election day as provided in W.S. 22-9-125(d)” at the end.

§ 22-8-109.
Party representation.

Judges and members of counting boards shall be divided between the participating political parties as nearly equal as possible.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-126; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-8-110.
Notice of appointment.

The county clerk shall immediately mail a notice of appointment to each person selected to serve as a judge of election or a member of a counting board or alternate. The notice shall also state that attendance at the training school for election officials is required unless similar training is otherwise completed to the satisfaction of the county clerk.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-127; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002, Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2.

§ 22-8-111.
Acceptance of appointment.

With each notice of appointment delivered by the county clerk there shall be a form for acceptance of the appointment or notice that each appointee shall be required to notify the county clerk of acceptance. The county clerk shall state the date by which the appointee shall be required to notify the clerk of acceptance. Failure of an appointee to notify the county clerk of acceptance within the time allotted by the county clerk results in a vacancy.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-128; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2015 ch. 76, § 1, effective July 1, 2015.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, rewrote the section, which read: “With each notice of appointment mailed by the county clerk there shall be a form for acceptance of the appointment. Each appointee shall file his acceptance with the county clerk within twelve (12) days after the acceptance form is mailed by the county clerk. Failure of an appointee to file an acceptance within twelve (12) days results in a vacancy.”

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

§ 22-8-112.
Filling vacancies.

Any vacancy occurring prior to an election day shall be filled by the county clerk from the list of alternates. If no alternates exist, any elector who is qualified may be appointed. Any expedient method of notice of appointment to the county clerk and to the appointee may be used. Vacancies may be filled temporarily or for the term.

If a judge is not present when polls open, or is unable to complete his duties, the vacancy shall be filled by a registered elector appointed by those judges present at the precinct polling place when the vacancy occurs and approved by the county clerk. If a member of a counting board is not present when the polls close, or is unable to complete his duties, the vacancy shall be filled by a registered elector appointed by those members of the counting board who are present.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-129; Laws 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 18, § 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

added “and approved by the county clerk” in (b).

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

§ 22-8-113.
Training schools; generally and payment for attending.

Not later than four (4) days before the primary and general election, the county clerk under the direction of the secretary of state shall conduct a training school for judges of election and members of counting boards to provide instruction in the performance of their duties. The training school, which is also open to the public, shall be held at the times and places announced by the county clerk, and the secretary of state shall prescribe the minimum curriculum for the school. Additional schools may be held at the discretion of the county clerk. Unless training is otherwise provided to the satisfaction of the county clerk, all judges of election and members of counting boards are obligated to attend at least one (1) such school. All judges and members of the counting board shall be paid not less than ten dollars ($10.00) as determined by the board of county commissioners for attending a school.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-130; Laws 1975, ch. 185, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2; 2008, ch. 115, § 1; 2013 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2013.

Cross references. —

As to computing periods of time, see §

22-2-110

.

The 2008 amendment,

substituted “secretary of state shall conduct” for “secretary of state and the county attorney shall conduct” in the first sentence.

Laws 2008, ch. 115, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 13, 2008.

The 2013 amendment,

effective July 1, 2013, substituted “ten dollars ($10.00)” for “five dollars ($5.00) nor more than twenty five dollars ($25.00)” in the last sentence.

§ 22-8-114.
Training schools; mileage payment and certificate.

Judges of election and members of counting boards and their alternates will be paid mileage in excess of five (5) miles at the rate authorized for county employees for attendance at training schools. The county clerk shall issue a certificate to all election officials and alternates who attend the school. This certificate expires two (2) years from the date of issue.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-131; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1991, ch. 243, § 2.

§ 22-8-115.
Oath for election officials.

An election official shall subscribe to this oath in writing before entering upon his duties at each election:

“I do solemnly swear (or affirm) that I will impartially and to the best of my knowledge and ability perform the duties of my office. I will studiously endeavor to prevent all frauds, deceit and abuse in the application of the election laws of this state.”

The oath shall be taken before the county clerk, his deputy or a previously sworn judge of election.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-132; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to oath of office generally, see art. 6, § 20, Wyo. Const.

§ 22-8-116.
Compensation.

Judges of election and members of counting boards shall be compensated for services at a rate to be determined by the board of county commissioners at the June meeting and stated on the notice sent to each nominee. The rate shall be not less than the state minimum wage. Compensation shall begin one (1) hour before a member assumes his duties. The election official who delivers the returns shall receive additional compensation for necessary travel beyond ten (10) miles at the rate authorized for county employees. If a flat rate is paid, said sum shall not be less than the state hourly minimum wage multiplied by the number of hours the polls are open plus one (1) hour.

History.

Laws 1973, ch. 251, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 22.1-133; Laws 1974, ch. 24, § 2; 1998, ch. 100, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to reimbursement of county employees for necessary travel, see §

18-3-110

.

As to minimum wage, see §

27-4-202

.